Arkansas, session 2025, HB1898.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 25, Chapter 8, Subchapter 1, is amended
*JLL354*
03/31/2025 9:37:25 AM JLL354

HB1898
to add additional sections to read as follows:
25-8-111. Regulatory Division of the Department of Finance and
Administration — Regulatory Administrator.
(a) The Regulatory Division is created within the Department of
Finance and Administration.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall appoint a Regulatory Administrator to oversee the Regulatory Division
of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(c) The administrator shall:
(1) Serve at the pleasure of the secretary;
(2) Report to the secretary; and
(3) Maintain oversight of:
(A) The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division;
(B) Arkansas Tobacco Control;
(C) The Arkansas Racing Commission; and
(D) The Regulatory Enforcement Division of the Department
of Finance and Administration.

25-8-112. Regulatory Enforcement Division.
(a) The Regulatory Enforcement Division is created within the
Regulatory Division of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(b) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall appoint an Enforcement Director to oversee the Regulatory Enforcement
Division of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(c) The director shall:
(1) Serve at the pleasure of the secretary; and
(2) Report to the Regulatory Administrator of the Regulatory
Division of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(d) The Regulatory Enforcement Division of the Department of Finance
and Administration is designated as a law enforcement agency.
(e) The director shall assign personnel as agents of the Regulatory
Enforcement Division of the Department of Finance and Administration to
conduct investigations related to the violation of:
(1) State law governing:
(A) Tobacco;
(B) Alcohol;
03/31/2025 9:37:25 AM JLL354

HB1898
(C) Medical marijuana; or
(D) Gambling or the promotion of gambling; and
(2) Rules promulgated by the:
(A) Alcoholic Beverage Control Board;
(B) Medical Marijuana Commission; or
(C) Tobacco Control Board.
(f) Personnel assigned as agents of the Regulatory Enforcement
Division of the Department of Finance and Administration under subsection (e)
of this section shall:
(1) Present findings to the relevant board regarding the
investigation of a violation of rules promulgated by the entities listed in
subdivision (e)(2) of this section;
(2) Be considered full-time law enforcement officers by the
Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training under § 12-9-
101 et seq.; and
(3) Have statewide law enforcement authority.
(g) The director may refer any investigation authorized under this
section to a prosecuting attorney or a law enforcement agency.


















03/31/2025 9:37:25 AM JLL354